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DIAGNOSTICS -

ENGINE

DI7JD-05

DTC

P 1600/96 ECM BATT Malfunction

CIRCUIT

DESCRIPTION

Battery positive voltage is supplied to terminal BATT of the engine ECU even when the ignition switch is OFF

foruse by the DTC memory and air

—fuelratio adaptive control value memory, etc.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
P1600/96 Openinback ower source circuit * Openinbackup power source circut
i Wi ircui
P upp Y . *EngineECU
HINT:

If DTC P1600/96 appear, the engine ECU does not store another DTC.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Readfreeze

malfunction.

framedatausinghand  -heldtester. Because free frame recordsthe engine conditions when
the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle was run-
ning or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air
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—fuel ratiowasleanorrich, etc. atthetime ofthe
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1 Check voltage between terminal BATT of engine ECU connector and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove the engine room ECU cover.
CHECK:
o o = Measure voltage between terminal BATT of the engine ECU
; connector and body ground.
O | o

)N\ Voltage: 9 - 14V

Roeess - Aos322 OK \ | Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

@

2 Check EFI fuse.

; PREPARATION:
Engine Room 4B Remove the EFI fuse from the engine room R/B.
o 0000000 | [OB0 CHECK:
D [:] D D D I Check continuity of EFI fuse.

OK:

L g Q D [_] % Continuity
fooooom (L (| |0

- / NG> Check for short in all harness and components

EFI Fuse connected to EFI fuse.

@

Check and repair harness or connector be-
tween battery, EFI fuse and engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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